Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-3,148
Health care coverage of children; insurer; discrimination against Department of Health and Human Services prohibited.

An insurer may not impose requirements on the department when the department has been assigned the rights of an individual who is eligible for medical assistance pursuant to the medical assistance program and who is covered for health benefits from the insurer that are different from requirements applicable to an agent or assignee of any other individual so covered.

Laws 1994, LB 1224, § 76.